Florida, session 2026, SB634.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (n) of subsection (6) of section 14 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 16 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 17 (n)1.âRates for coverage provided by the corporation must 18 be actuarially sound pursuant to s. 627.062 and not competitive 19 with approved rates charged in the admitted voluntary market so 20 that the corporation functions as a residual market mechanism to 21 provide insurance only when insurance cannot be procured in the 22 voluntary market, except as otherwise provided in this 23 paragraph. The office shall provide the corporation such 24 information as would be necessary to determine whether rates are 25 competitive. The corporation shall file its recommended rates 26 with the office at least annually. The corporation shall provide 27 any additional information regarding the rates which the office 28 requires. The office shall consider the recommendations of the 29 board and issue a final order establishing the rates for the 30 corporation within 45 days after the recommended rates are 31 filed. The corporation may not pursue an administrative 32 challenge or judicial review of the final order of the office. 33 2.âIn addition to the rates otherwise determined pursuant 34 to this paragraph, the corporation shall impose and collect an 35 amount equal to the premium tax provided in s. 624.509 to 36 augment the financial resources of the corporation. 37 3.âAfter the public hurricane loss-projection model under 38 s. 627.06281 has been found to be accurate and reliable by the 39 Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology, the 40 model shall be considered when establishing the windstorm 41 portion of the corporationâs rates. The corporation may use the 42 public model results in combination with the results of private 43 models to calculate rates for the windstorm portion of the 44 corporationâs rates. This subparagraph does not require or allow 45 the corporation to adopt rates lower than the rates otherwise 46 required or allowed by this paragraph. 47 4.âThe corporation must make a recommended actuarially 48 sound rate filing for each personal and commercial line of 49 business it writes. 50 5.âNotwithstanding the boardâs recommended rates and the 51 officeâs final order regarding the corporationâs filed rates 52 under subparagraph 1., the corporation shall annually implement 53 a rate increase which, except for sinkhole coverage, does not 54 exceed the following for any single policy issued by the 55 corporation, excluding coverage changes and surcharges: 56 a.âTwelve percent for 2023. 57 b.âThirteen percent for 2024. 58 c.âFourteen percent for 2025. 59 d.âFifteen percent for 2026 and all subsequent years. 60 6.âThe corporation may also implement an increase to 61 reflect the effect on the corporation of the cash buildup factor 62 pursuant to s. 215.555(5)(b). 63 7.âThe corporationâs implementation of rates as prescribed 64 in subparagraphs 5. and 8. shall cease for any line of business 65 written by the corporation upon the corporationâs implementation 66 of actuarially sound rates. Thereafter, the corporation shall 67 annually make a recommended actuarially sound rate filing that 68 is not competitive with approved rates in the admitted voluntary 69 market for each commercial and personal line of business the 70 corporation writes. 71 8.âNew or renewal personal lines policies that do not cover 72 a primary residence are not subject to the rate increase 73 limitations in subparagraph 5., but may not be charged more than 74 50 percent above, nor less than, the prior yearâs established 75 rate for the corporation. 76 9.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âprimary residenceâ 77 means the dwelling that is the policyholderâs primary home or is 78 a rental property that is the primary home of the tenant, and 79 which the policyholder or tenant occupies for more than 9 months 80 of each year. 81 10.a.âFor an order establishing the rates for the 82 corporation issued pursuant to subparagraph 1. on or after June 83 1, 2026, the requirements of subparagraphs 5. and 8. do not 84 apply to any new policy issued by the corporation, including 85 when such policy is subsequently renewed by the corporation. 86 b.âSub-subparagraph a. does not apply to any new policy 87 that covers a primary residence located in a county where the 88 office determines there is not a reasonable degree of 89 competition. 90 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.